Maine, session 132, LD207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 323, §29, is
amended to read:
F. A contributor may make a qualifying contribution to a participating candidate in the
form of cash, as long as the contributor signs a form prepared by the commission
affirming that the contributor made the contribution with personal funds. A candidate
receiving qualifying contributions in cash shall submit the contributions to the
commission in the aggregate in the form of a cashier's check or money order payable
to the fund. The candidate may not deposit qualifying contributions received in cash
into the candidate's campaign account.